Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2369.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1552, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1552. Jurisdiction of municipal and justice courts; mayor of municipality signature required A. Municipal courts and justice courts have concurrent jurisdiction over all civil and misdemeanor criminal violations of chapters 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 14 and 15 of this title and over class 2 and 3 misdemeanor criminal violations of chapter 25 of this title that are committed within their boundaries by persons eighteen years of age or older. B. Municipal courts and justice courts have concurrent jurisdiction over civil traffic violations committed within their boundaries by persons under eighteen years of age if the presiding judge of the superior court in the county declined jurisdiction pursuant to section 8-202. C. A citation that is issued as a result of a civil traffic violation or a misdemeanor criminal offense of this title and that is generated by a photo ENFORCEMENT system as defined in section 28-601 must be signed by the mayor of the municipality in which the violation or offense OCCURRED. the mayor of the municipality may sign the citation by electronic signature but If the citation is not signed by the mayor of the municipality: 1. The citation shall be dismissed. 2. The court shall notify the person who is charged with the violation or offense that the citation is dismissed because the mayor of the municipality did not sign the citation. END_STATUTE